Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Purpose, Powers and Capital

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-201.
Nature, purpose and duration of statutory foundations.

A statutory foundation shall be an entity distinct from its founders, contributors, beneficiaries and any other persons.

Unless stated otherwise in the articles of formation, a statutory foundation has perpetual duration.

Except for those purposes provided in subsection (e) of this section, a statutory foundation may be created for any lawful purpose, whether the statutory foundation is for profit or for charitable purposes, as defined in W.S. 17-30-102(a)(v).

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

In addition to those purposes provided in subsection (c) of this section, a statutory foundation may be organized for the purpose of holding or investing in other entities or assets, including those entities or assets that are the property of the statutory foundation.

A statutory foundation may not be created to act as a financial institution or an insurer, as defined in W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xvi).

The purpose of a statutory foundation shall not be amended or restated unless the articles of formation expressly provide that the purpose of the statutory foundation “may be amended,” “may be restated” or include words of similar import or unless an amendment or restatement is required pursuant to a court order.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, by ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, in (c), deleted "which may be included in the articles of formation of the foundation, regardless of" following "lawful purpose," added "statutory" preceding "foundation," deleted ", provided that a statutory foundation shall:" and made a related change; in (f), substituted "purpose of" for "purposes for which," deleted "may be created under this act" preceding "shall not be," added "unless" preceding "an amendment" and made a stylistic change; and repealed (c)(i) and (ii), which read, "(i) Confer a benefit on at least one (1) person; and (ii) Be authorized to hold tangible and intangible property and accumulate income generated by that property for the purposes of this act."

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-202.
Enforcement of charitable purposes.

If the articles of formation or the operating agreement of a statutory foundation formed for a charitable purpose do not indicate or otherwise provide for selection of a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary, or if the designated charitable purpose cannot be completed or no longer exists, the court may select one (1) or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection shall be consistent with the intent of the founder to the extent that intent can be ascertained.

A founder, the board of directors or the protector of a statutory foundation formed for a charitable purpose may commence a civil action to enforce the charitable purpose of the statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, in (a), added "that" in the last sentence and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-203.
Powers of a statutory foundation.

A statutory foundation has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name and has the power to take all actions necessary or convenient to carry on the activities of the foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-204.
Property contribution.

The initial property contributed to a statutory foundation may consist of tangible or intangible property, whether or not the contribution is made as a gift or otherwise.

After the contribution of initial property to the statutory foundation, and if permitted by the operating agreement of the foundation, additional contributions may be made to the statutory foundation by a founder or any contributor.

The tangible and intangible property of the statutory foundation may include:

Initial contributions of property;

Additional contributions of property;

Any accumulated income.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.